California, session 20252026, AB1402.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17052 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17052. (a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2015, there shall be allowed against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, an earned income tax credit in an amount equal to an amount determined in accordance with Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income, as applicable for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year, except as otherwise provided in this section.(2) (A) The amount of the credit determined under Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income, as modified by this section, shall be multiplied by the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for the taxable year.(B) Unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act, the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2015, shall be 0 percent.(C) The earned income tax credit authorized by this section shall only be operative for taxable years for which resources are authorized in the annual Budget Act for the Franchise Tax Board to oversee and audit returns associated with the credit.(b) (1) In lieu of the table prescribed in Section 32(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to percentages, the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children7.65%7.65%1 qualifying child34%34%2 qualifying children40%40%3 or more qualifying children45%45%(2) (A) In lieu of the table prescribed in Section 32(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount is:No qualifying children$3,290$3,2901 qualifying child$4,940$4,9402 or more qualifying children$6,935$6,935(B) Section 32(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to joint returns, shall not apply.(c) (1) Section 32(c)(1)(A)(ii)(I) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “this state” for “the United States.”(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, Section 32(c)(1)(A)(ii)(II) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by deleting “25 but not attained age 65” and inserting in lieu thereof the following: “18.”(3) Section 32(c)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:(A) Section 32(c)(2)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by deleting “plus” and inserting in lieu thereof the following: “and only if such amounts are subject to withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.”(B) Section 32(c)(2)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.(4) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, paragraph (3) shall not apply and in lieu thereof Section 32(c)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:(A) Section 32(c)(2)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by deleting “plus” and inserting in lieu thereof the following: “and only if such amounts are subject to withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code, plus.”(B) Section 32(c)(2)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply.(5) Section 32(c)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to place of abode, is modified by substituting “this state” for “the United States.”(d) Section 32(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “$3,400” for “$2,200.”(e) (1) In lieu of Section 32(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to inflation adjustments, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, the amounts specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and in subdivision (d) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019, when recomputing the amounts referenced in paragraph (1), the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index shall be deemed to be the greater of 3.1 percent or the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index as calculated under subdivision (h) of Section 17041 for that taxable year.(3) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, and before January 1, 2020, when recomputing the amounts referenced in paragraph (1), the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index shall be deemed to be the greater of 3.5 percent or the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index as calculated under subdivision (h) of Section 17041 for that taxable year.(f) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section exceeds the tax liability computed under this part for the taxable year, the excess shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the taxpayer.(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed or improper payments from being made with respect to net earnings from self-employment.(B) The adoption of any regulations pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, these emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State, and shall remain in effect until revised or repealed by the Franchise Tax Board.(h) Notwithstanding any other law, amounts refunded pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as the federal earned income refund for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or amounts of those benefits.(i) (1) For the purpose of implementing the credit allowed by this section for the 2015 taxable year, the Franchise Tax Board shall be exempt from the following:(A) Special Project Report requirements under State Administrative Manual Sections 4819.36, 4945, and 4945.2.(B) Special Project Report requirements under Statewide Information Management Manual Section 30.(C) Section 11.00 of the 2015 Budget Act.(D) Sections 12101, 12101.5, 12102, and 12102.1 of the Public Contract Code.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall formally incorporate the scope, costs, and schedule changes associated with the implementation of the credit allowed by this section in its next anticipated Special Project Report for its Enterprise Data to Revenue Project.(j) (1) In accordance with Section 41 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the purpose of the California Earned Income Tax Credit is to reduce poverty among California’s poorest working families and individuals. To measure whether the credit achieves its intended purpose, the Franchise Tax Board shall annually prepare a written report on the following:(A) The number of tax returns claiming the credit.(B) The number of individuals represented on tax returns claiming the credit.(C) The average credit amount on tax returns claiming the credit.(D) The distribution of credits by number of dependents and income ranges. The income ranges shall encompass the phase-in and phaseout ranges of the credit.(E) Using data from tax returns claiming the credit, including an estimate of the federal tax credit determined under Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, an estimate of the number of families who are lifted out of deep poverty by the credit and an estimate of the number of families who are lifted out of deep poverty by the combination of the credit and the federal tax credit. For the purposes of this subdivision, a family is in “deep poverty” if the income of the family is less than 50 percent of the federal poverty threshold.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the written report to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Human Services.(k) The tax credit allowed by this section shall be known as the California Earned Income Tax Credit.(l) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 722 of the Statutes of 2016 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.(m) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2018, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, and the earned income amount is greater than or equal to the corresponding amount in the table set forth in paragraph (2) below, then in lieu of the table prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children2.20%1.22%1 qualifying child3.10%2.29%2 qualifying children2.13%3.45%3 or more qualifying children2.12%3.49%(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2018, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, then in lieu of the table prescribed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows:  In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount is:No qualifying children$5,354$5,3541 qualifying child$9,484$9,4842 qualifying children$13,794$13,7943 or more qualifying children$13,875$13,875(n) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred three dollars ($103) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty-eight dollars ($258) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, and the earned income amount is greater than or equal to the corresponding amount in the table set forth in paragraph (2) below, then in lieu of the table prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children2.20%1.08%1 qualifying child3.10%2.00%2 qualifying children2.13%2.82%3 or more qualifying children2.12%2.85%(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred three dollars ($103) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty-eight dollars ($258) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, then in lieu of the table prescribed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows: In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount is:No qualifying children$5,520$5,5201 qualifying child$9,778$9,7782 qualifying children$14,222$14,2223 or more qualifying children$14,305$14,305(o) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to two hundred dollars ($200) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to five hundred five dollars ($505) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, and the earned income amount is greater than or equal to the corresponding amount in the table set forth in paragraph (2) below, then in lieu of the table prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children5.43%0.92%1 qualifying child6.33%2.88%2 qualifying children4.20%3.75%3 or more qualifying children4.15%3.78%(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to two hundred dollars ($200) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to five hundred five dollars ($505) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, then in lieu of the table prescribed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows:In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount is:No qualifying children$4,334$4,3341 qualifying child$9,381$9,3812 qualifying children$14,137$14,1373 or more qualifying children$14,302$14,302(3) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and until and including the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, both of the following shall occur:(A) The amounts in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(B) The phaseout percentage for each of the four categories of eligible individuals shall be recalculated by the Franchise Tax Board in such a manner that, for a taxpayer with an earned income of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the calculated amount of credit is equal to zero.(4) (A) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the amounts in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(B) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the phaseout percentages for the prior taxable year, as recalculated under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), shall apply.(p) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the credit allowed by this section shall be reduced by any amount received as a Fresh Start Grant pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 18946.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (q) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, Section 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to identification numbers, is modified as follows:(1) By deleting “(other than a social security number issued pursuant to clause (II) (or that portion of clause (III) that relates to clause (II)) of section 205(c)(2)(B)(i) of the Social Security Act).”(2) By substituting “federal individual taxpayer identification number or a social security number” for “social security number.”(r) An eligible individual, eligible individual’s spouse, or qualifying child using a federal individual taxpayer identification number as authorized under subdivision (p) shall:(1) Upon request of the Franchise Tax Board, provide:(A) Identifying documents acceptable for purposes of obtaining a California driver’s license or identification card as authorized by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code and related regulations adopted for purposes of establishing documents acceptable to prove identity.(B) Identifying documents used to report earned income for the taxable year.(2) Upon receiving a valid social security number issued to that individual by the Social Security Administration, notify the Franchise Tax Board, in the time and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.(s) The Legislature finds and declares that, to the extent they are otherwise qualified for a credit under this section, undocumented persons are eligible for the tax credit authorized by this section within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.SEC. 2. Section 17052.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17052.1. (a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, there shall be allowed against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, a young child tax credit to a qualified taxpayer, in an amount as determined under paragraph (2).(2) (A) (i) The amount of the young child tax credit shall be equal to one thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars ($1,176), multiplied by the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for the taxable year as specified for in Section 17052.(ii) The amount of the young child tax credit specified under clause (i) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(B) The young child tax credit allowable in any taxable year to any qualified taxpayer shall be limited to the maximum amount specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) as recomputed under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).(C) (i) The young child tax credit shall be reduced by twenty dollars ($20) for each one hundred dollars ($100), or fraction thereof, by which the qualified taxpayer’s earned income, as defined in Section 17052, exceeds the “threshold amount.” For purposes of this section, the “threshold amount” shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).(ii) (I) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041, except that the resulting products shall be rounded off to the nearest cent.(II) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, and before January 1, 2024, the amount calculated under subclause (I) shall substitute for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).(III) The Franchise Tax Board shall calculate a graduated reduction amount in such a manner that, for a qualified taxpayer with earned income of one dollar ($1) or more in excess of the maximum earned income that results in a credit amount greater than zero dollars ($0) pursuant to Section 17052, the amount of the credit under this section is equal to zero. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the graduated reduction amount calculated pursuant to this subclause shall be substituted for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).(iii) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the “threshold amount” in this subparagraph shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(D) The young child tax credit authorized by this section shall only be operative for taxable years for which resources are authorized in the annual Budget Act for the Franchise Tax Board to oversee and audit returns associated with the credit allowed under Section 17052.(b) (1) “Qualified taxpayer” means an eligible individual who has at least one qualifying child and who satisfies either of the following:(A) Has been allowed a tax credit under Section 17052.(B) Meets all of the following requirements:(i) Would otherwise have been allowed a tax credit under Section 17052, but has earned income, as defined in Section 32(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by Section 17052, of zero dollars ($0) or less.(ii) Does not have net losses in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in the taxable year.(iii) Does not have wages, salaries, tips, and other employee compensation in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in the taxable year.(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the amounts specified under clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph(B) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(c) “Qualifying child” shall have the same meaning as under Section 17052, except that the child shall be younger than six years of age as of the last day of the taxable year.(d) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed or improper payments from being made with respect to net earnings from self-employment.(B) The adoption of any regulations pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, these emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State, and shall remain in effect until revised or repealed by the Franchise Tax Board.(e) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section exceeds the tax liability computed under this part for the taxable year, the excess shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the qualified taxpayer.(f) Notwithstanding any other law, amounts refunded pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as the federal earned income refund for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or amounts of those benefits.(g) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the credit allowed by this section shall be reduced by any amount received as a Fresh Start Grant pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 18946.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (h) (1) In accordance with Section 41, the purpose of the Young Child Tax Credit is to reduce poverty among California’s poorest working families and young children. To measure whether the credit achieves its intended purpose, the Franchise Tax Board shall annually prepare a written report on the following:(A) The number of tax returns claiming the credit.(B) The number of qualifying children represented on tax returns claiming the credit.(C) The average credit amount on tax returns claiming the credit.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the written report to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Human Services.(i) The Legislature finds and declares that, to the extent they are otherwise qualified for a credit under this section, undocumented persons are eligible for the tax credit authorized by this section within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.(j) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).SEC. 3. Section 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17052.2. (a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, there shall be allowed against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, a foster youth tax credit to a qualified taxpayer, in an amount as determined under paragraph (2).(2) (A) The amount of the foster youth tax credit shall be equal to one thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars ($1,176), multiplied by the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for the taxable year, as specified in Section 17052.(B) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the amount in subparagraph (A) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(C) (i) The foster youth tax credit shall be reduced by twenty dollars ($20) for each one hundred dollars ($100), or fraction thereof, by which the qualified taxpayer’s earned income, as defined in Section 17052, exceeds the threshold amount.(ii) (I) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i) shall be recomputed in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041, except that for purposes of this clause, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041 shall be modified by substituting “nearest cent” for “nearest one dollar ($1).”(II) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, and before January 1, 2024, the amount calculated under subclause (I) shall substitute for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).(III) The Franchise Tax Board shall calculate a graduated reduction amount in such a manner that, for a qualified taxpayer with earned income of one dollar ($1) or more in excess of the maximum earned income that results in a credit amount greater than zero dollars ($0) pursuant to Section 17052, the amount of the credit under this section is equal to zero. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the graduated reduction amount calculated pursuant to this subclause shall be substituted for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).(iii) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the threshold amount shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.(b) The foster youth tax credit authorized by this section shall only be operative for taxable years for which resources are authorized in the annual Budget Act for the Franchise Tax Board to oversee and audit returns associated with the earned income tax credit allowed under Section 17052.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Qualified taxpayer,” means an individual who satisfies all of the following:(A) Has been allowed a tax credit under Section 17052 for the taxable year.(B) Is 18 to 25 years of age, inclusive, as of the last day of the taxable year.(C) Was in foster care while 13 years of age or older in an AFDC-FC placement, as described in Section 11402 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including a tribally approved home, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program eligible placement, as described in Article 6 (commencing with Section 11450) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, by a Title IV-E agency, pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement or a juvenile court order.(2) “Threshold amount” shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).(3) “Title IV-E agency” means either of the following:(A) A county child welfare agency or probation department that administers foster care placements under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).(B) An Indian tribe, tribal organization, or tribal consortium located in California or with lands that extend into the state that has an agreement with the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to administer foster care placement under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).(d) (1) As provided for in Section 10850.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and subject to federal approvals or waivers, the State Department of Social Services shall provide to the Franchise Tax Board the data regarding a qualified taxpayer placed by a Title IV-E agency that may be necessary to verify that an individual qualifies for the foster youth tax credit. The data provided shall remain confidential and shall be used only for purposes directly connected with the foster youth tax credit.(2) In the event federal approval or waivers pursuant to paragraph (1) are not provided, the Franchise Tax Board and the State Department of Social Services shall explore alternative methods to verify foster care status for individuals described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) in a manner consistent with state and federal law.(3) The State Department of Social Services shall seek all appropriate federal waivers or approvals for the implementation of this subdivision as necessary. This subdivision shall be implemented only if necessary federal waivers or approvals are granted.(e) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section.(2) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed or improper payments from being made with respect to net earnings from self-employment.(3) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any regulation, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.(f) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section exceeds the tax liability computed under this part for the taxable year, the excess shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the qualified taxpayer.(g) Notwithstanding any other law, amounts refunded pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as the federal earned income refund for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or amounts of those benefits.(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the payment authorized pursuant to this section shall not be taken into account as income, and shall not be taken into account as resources for a period of 12 months from receipt, for purposes of determining the eligibility of such individual, or any other individual, for benefits or assistance or the amount or extent of benefits or assistance under any state or local program not covered in subdivision (g). With respect to a state or local program, this subdivision shall only be implemented to the extent that it does not conflict with federal law relating to that program, and that any required federal approval or waiver is first obtained for that program.(i) The Legislature finds and declares that, to the extent they are otherwise qualified for a credit under this section, undocumented persons are eligible for the tax credit authorized by this section within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.(j) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the credit allowed by this section shall be reduced by any amount received as a Fresh Start Grant pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 18946.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (k) (1) In accordance with Section 41, the purpose of the Foster Care Tax Credit is to reduce poverty among California’s young adults who have been in the foster care program. To measure whether the credit achieves its intended purpose, the Franchise Tax Board shall annually prepare a written report on the following:(A) The number of tax returns claiming the credit.(B) The average credit amount on tax returns claiming the credit.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the written report, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Human Services.(3) The disclosure provisions of this subdivision shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542 under Article 2 (commencing with 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2.SEC. 4. Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 18946) is added to Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 10.5. Fresh Start Grants18946. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as, the Fresh Start Grants Program.18946.1. The Legislature finds and declares that, in order to better serve Californians that struggle with poverty, the Fresh Start Grants Program is intended to replace the existing California Earned Income Tax Credit under Section 17052 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the Young Child Tax Credit under Section 17052.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the foster youth tax credit under Section 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, by making those amounts allowed as a refundable tax credit available immediately as a grant instead.18946.2. (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, for each person receiving benefits under CalFresh (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900)), the county welfare department shall determine eligibility for the following refundable tax credits:(1) The California Earned Income Tax Credit pursuant to Section 17052 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(2) The Young Child Tax Credit pursuant to Section 17052.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(3) The foster youth tax credit pursuant to Section 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(b) Where a recipient of benefits is determined pursuant to subdivision (a) to be eligible for a refundable tax credit, the county welfare department shall calculate serve as the primary agency responsible for calculating and distributing the value of that credit received by the recipient, and shall provide that amount to the recipient as to the recipient in the form of a Fresh Start Grant. The county welfare department shall ensure that the grant is issued in a timely and accurate manner, in compliance with all applicable state and federal regulations.(c) Fresh Start Grants received pursuant to this section shall be funded through the Fresh Start Grants Fund, established pursuant to Section 18946.3.(d) The county welfare department shall be responsible for administering the Fresh Start Grants to eligible recipients and shall do all of the following:(1) Establish procedures for grant distribution.(2) Implement a system to ensure timely and compliant distribution of funds.(3) Verify recipient eligibility based on CalFresh and other qualifying programs.(4) Prioritize benefit distribution by electronic funds transfer.(5) Submit annual progress reports to the State Department of Social Services and Franchise Tax Board.(6) Ensure communications are accessible and multilingual, and provide assistance to individuals with limited English proficiency or disabilities.(e) If a recipient is overpaid due to administrative error, the county welfare department shall notify the individual and deduct the overpaid amount from future grants.(1) A written explanation must be provided to the recipient.(2) If no future grant is issued, a reasonable repayment plan shall be offered.(3) A right to appeal shall be provided if the recipient disputes the overpayment or repayment terms.18946.3. (a) The Fresh Start Grants Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury for the purpose of issuing Fresh Start Grants pursuant to Section 18946.2.(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys deposited into the fund are continuously appropriated to State Department of Social Services for allocation to county welfare departments for the purposes of issuing the Fresh Start Grants required by Section 18946.2. to administer the Fresh Start Grants. Allocations shall be based on the population of eligible recipients and the county’s demonstrated administrative capacity. (c) No later than June 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the total amount of credits to be issued pursuant to Sections 17052, 17052.1, and 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for taxable years beginning on or after the following January 1. The Franchise Tax Board shall request that the Controller transfer that amount from the Tax Relief and Refund Account to the Fresh Start Grants Fund.18946.4. (a) The State Department of Social Services shall provide all information relating to the issuance of Fresh Start Grants to the Franchise Tax Board. relevant information to both the Franchise Tax Board and county welfare departments, including the value of grants issued and any data necessary to ensure accurate distribution and tracking. That information will be in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, and shall include, at minimum, the amount received by a recipient pursuant to Section 18946.2, clearly indicating what amounts were received pursuant to which provision of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(b) County welfare departments shall submit annual reports to the State Department of Social Services and the Franchise Tax Board, including the following:(1) Number of grants distributed.(2) Total amount disbursed.(3) Number of eligible recipients.(4) Administrative challenges and resolutions.(5) Instances of fraud or error and corrective actions taken.(b)(c) The State Department of Social Services, and any county welfare department, may request information necessary to accurately calculate the benefits provided pursuant to Section 18946.2 from the Franchise Tax Board, and the Franchise Tax Board shall provide that information to the requesting agency. Any taxpayer information shared pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to the provisions of Section 19542 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.18946.5. The State Department of Social Services, county welfare departments, and all entities administering the Fresh Start Grants shall implement data safeguards to protect recipients, including undocumented individuals. These safeguards shall include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) End-to-end data encryption.(b) Role-based access controls.(c) Minimized use and collection of sensitive identifiers.(d) Secure data retention and disposal policies.(e) Mandatory data security training for relevant personnel.(f) Compliance from all third-party contractors.(g) Prompt breach notification to affected individuals and the Department of Justice.(h) Strict confidentiality protections for undocumented recipients, prohibiting immigration-related data sharing unless required by law.18946.6. The California Privacy Protection Agency shall monitor compliance with data security protocols under Section 18946.5. The agency shall do all of the following:(a) Conduct regular audits of participating agencies.(b) Submit an annual compliance report to the Legislature.(c) Investigate any breach or violation of data security requirements.18946.7. (a) The State Department of Social Services shall commission an independent study of the Fresh Start Grants Program in collaboration with the Franchise Tax Board and county welfare departments.(b) The study shall assess all of the following:(1) Poverty reduction outcomes.(2) Participation rates compared to tax credits.(3) Program accessibility and public awareness.(4) Long-term economic mobility.(5) Administrative efficiency.(c) An interim report shall be submitted 18 months after implementation; a final report shall be submitted no later than June 30, 2030.(d) Reports shall be submitted, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, with the Legislature and published online.(e) Funding shall be provided from the Fresh Start Grants Fund or other available sources.18946.8. (a) In addition to those identified in subdivision (a) of Section 18946.2, any person eligible for a California statewide safety net program shall be evaluated for Fresh Start Grant eligibility by the county welfare department, provided they meet income and residency criteria consistent with Sections 17052, 17052.1, and 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(b) For purposes of this Section, “California statewide safety net program” includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) CalWORKs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3).(2) Medi-Cal (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000.4) of Part 3).(3) General Assistance (Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000)).(4) California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (Article 2 (commencing with Section 123275) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).(5) In-Home Supportive Services (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3).(6) SSI/SSP (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3).(c) The State Department of Social Services, in coordination with county agencies, shall determine procedures for verifying eligibility and issuing grants.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.